Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF96.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1639SS (8) 91 jm/md S.F. 96 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 427.7 Petition for abatement of 1 taxes ââ volunteer emergency services provider. 2 1. a. A volunteer emergency services provider whose 3 homestead is located in the local service area of the volunteer 4 agency or entity for which the individual is a volunteer and 5 who has been a volunteer emergency services provider for five 6 or more years, earns less than five thousand dollars per year 7 for service as a volunteer emergency services provider, and 8 is in good standing with the providerâs volunteer agency or 9 entity, including being active in monthly meetings, training, 10 and response calls, may file a petition, duly sworn to and 11 accompanied with the signature and certification as to good 12 standing from the chief officer of the petitionerâs volunteer 13 agency or entity, with the board of supervisors of the county 14 where the petitionerâs homestead is located, requesting 15 abatement of property taxes and special assessments assessed on 16 the individualâs homestead by a taxing authority, and giving 17 other information as the board may require. 18 b. For purposes of this section: 19 (1) âHomesteadâ means the same as defined in section 425.11. 20 (2) âVolunteer emergency services providerâ means the same 21 as defined in section 100B.14. 22 2. a. The petition shall be filed by October 31 preceding 23 the first fiscal year for which the abatement is requested, 24 and shall be on a form prescribed by the department of revenue 25 specifying the type of abatement sought under subsection 3. 26 Following receipt of the petition, the board of supervisors 27 shall forward a copy of the petition to the governing body of 28 each taxing authority that levies taxes or special assessments 29 on the homestead. If the board of supervisors determines that 30 the petitioner satisfies the criteria under this section, the 31 abatement shall apply to all applicable taxes and special 32 assessments on the homestead, excluding those for which an 33 objection by the governing body taxing authority was filed with 34 or approved by the board of supervisors within thirty days of 35 -1- LSB 1639SS (8) 91 jm/md 1/ 4 S.F. 96 the board providing a copy of the petition. By December 31, 1 the board of supervisors shall order the county treasurer to 2 abate the collection of the taxes and special assessments that 3 are assessed against the eligible petitionerâs homestead for 4 the assessment year during which the petition is filed and, if 5 specified by the board, the taxes and special assessments for 6 one or more future years, subject to the petitioner continuing 7 to meet the qualifications of this section. The abatement 8 approved by the board of supervisors shall apply to the taxes 9 and special assessments of taxing authorities for which an 10 objection was not filed or approved and shall not exceed the 11 amount specified under subsection 3. 12 b. If an objection has been filed, the objection must be 13 filed each subsequent year the taxes and special assessments 14 are abated pursuant to this section; otherwise the taxes and 15 special assessments related to the objection shall be abated 16 for each subsequent year for which an objection is not filed. 17 3. The board of supervisors may approve a petition under 18 this section by authorizing an abatement of taxes and special 19 assessments specified under subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , not 20 to exceed the following: 21 a. For a volunteer emergency services provider that does not 22 meet the requirements of paragraph âbâ , an amount equal to ten 23 percent of all such taxes and special assessments due on the 24 homestead, not to exceed five hundred dollars. 25 b. For a volunteer emergency services provider who has 26 been a volunteer emergency services provider for ten or more 27 years, notwithstanding the active service requirements under 28 subsection 1, an amount equal to ten percent of all such taxes 29 and special assessments due on the homestead, not to exceed 30 five hundred dollars per year, during the remainder of the 31 volunteer emergency services providerâs life, so long as the 32 providerâs homestead is in the local service area of the agency 33 or entity for which the provider was a volunteer. 34 4. The amount of the abatement shall be apportioned among 35 -2- LSB 1639SS (8) 91 jm/md 2/ 4 S.F. 96 such property tax levies and special assessments in the 1 proportion that each applicable levy or assessment makes up the 2 total amount of such taxes and special assessments due on the 3 homestead by the applicable taxing authorities for which an 4 objection was not filed or approved. 5 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 6 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 7 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to property taxes 8 due and payable in fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 9 2026. 10